Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5850.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8a. (1) A public water supply shall ensure that the critical infrastructure has security measures in place to protect against all of the following: (a) Cyberattacks. (b) Physical attacks or cyber disruptions to critical functions such as pumping, storage, monitoring, cooling, and fire suppression. (c) Cyber compromise. (2) A public water supply shall implement a risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program to achieve the security measures described in subsection (1). The risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program must be aligned with nationally recognized cybersecurity frameworks and guidance, including the NIST cybersecurity framework and guidance issued by the cybersecurity and infrastructure security agency, without requiring compliance with any single framework or technology. (3) A public water supply shall use all of the following systems, as applicable: (a) Safety-critical systems that are capable of defaulting to a safe state. (b) Redundant cooling and thermal controls. (c) Fire suppression that is capable of operating independent of remote commands. (d) On-site manual override access. (e) Segmentation of safety-critical systems from public-facing networks. (4) A public water supply shall create and maintain an incident response plan and a disaster recovery plan that include, but are not limited to, the following information: (a) Employment roles and responsibilities. (b) Communication and notification procedures. (c) System restoration priorities. (d) Procedures for coordinating with emergency responders. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Critical infrastructure" means a waterworks system and associated safety critical operational technology necessary to provide safe and reliable drinking water. (b) "Safety-critical systems" means operational technology and related systems that are necessary for the safe operation of a public water supply and to prevent conditions that could pose a risk to the public health or safety or system reliability. Sec. 21. (1) A Except as provided in subsection (3), a person who that violates this act or the rules promulgated under this act or an order issued pursuant to in accordance with this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000.00 for each day of violation, or by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both. (2) A law enforcement officer may issue and serve an appearance ticket upon on a person for a minor offense pursuant to in accordance with sections 9c to 9g of chapter IV of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 764.9c to 764.9g. (3) A person that violates section 8a is subject to a civil fine of not more than $25,000.00 per day per violation. Each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate violation. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (4) (3) As used in this section, "minor offense" means a violation of a permit issued under this act that does not functionally impair the operation or capacity of a waterworks system or the level of public health protection it provides. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.